cs: Elektronika > Herní konzole – příslušenství: Nabíjecí dokovací stanice; Domácí herní konzole – příslušenství; Interaktivní herní figurky; Přenosné herní konzole – příslušenství; Kokpity pro sim racing; Kabely herních konzolí; Herní ovladače; Příslušenství k headsetům pro virtuální realitu
da: Elektronik > Videospilkonsol – tilbehør: Opladningsdokker; Hjemmespilkonsol – tilbehør; Interaktive spilfigurer; Tilbehør til bærbar spilkonsol; Simulator-racercockpit; Kabler til spilkonsoller; Spilcontrollere; Tilbehør til virtual reality-headset
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria do gier wideo: Stacje ładujące; Akcesoria do domowych konsol do gier; Interaktywne figury do gier; Akcesoria do przenośnych konsol do gier; Kokpity do gier wyścigowych; Kable konsol gier wideo; Kontrolery gier wideo; Akcesoria do zestawu słuchawek rzeczywistości wirtualnej
de: Elektronik > Zubehör für Videospielkonsolen: Ladestationen; Zubehör für Spielkonsolen; Interaktive Gaming-Figuren; Zubehör für mobile Spielkonsolen; Sim-Racing-Cockpits; Videospielkonsolen-Kabel; Videospiel-Controller; Virtual-Reality-Headset-Zubehör
sv: Elektronik > Tillbehör till dataspelskonsoler: Laddningsdockor; Tillbehör till hemdataspelkonsoler; Interaktiva spelfigurer; Tillbehör till portabla spelkonsoler; Sim racing-cockpits; Kablar till spelkonsoler; Videospelskontroller; Tillbehör till virtual reality-headset
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor videogameconsoles: Oplaaddocks; Accessoires voor gameconsole voor thuis; Interactieve gamefiguren; Accessoires voor draagbare gameconsole; Simracing cockpits; Videogameconsole kabels; Videogame controllers; Virtual reality headset accessoires
hr-HR: Elektronika > Dodaci za konzole za video igre: Dokovi za punjenje; Dodaci za kućne igraće konzole; Interaktivne figure za igranje; Dodaci za prijenosne igraće konzole; Kokpiti za simulaciju utrka; Kabeli za konzole za videoigre; Kontroleri za videoigre; Dodaci za naočale za virtualnu stvarnost
fi: Elektroniikka > Videopelikonsolien lisätarvikkeet: Lataustelakat; Kodin pelikonsolitarvikkeet; Vuorovaikutteinen pelihahmo; Kannettavien pelikonsolien lisätarvikkeet; Simulaattoriajo-ohjaamo; Videopelikonsolin kaapeli; Videopeliohjain; Virtuaalitodellisuuskuulokkeen lisävaruste
en: Electronics > Video Game Console Accessories: Charging Docks; Home Game Console Accessories; Interactive Gaming Figures; Portable Game Console Accessories; Sim Racing Cockpits; Video Game Console Cables; Video Game Controllers; Virtual Reality Headset Accessories
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios de consola de videojogos: Estações de alimentação; Acessórios de consola de jogos em casa; Figuras interativas de jogos; Acessórios de consola de jogos portáteis; Cockpits de simulação de corridas; Cabos de consola de videojogos; Comandos de videojogos; Acessórios para headsets de realidade virtual
sk-SK: Elektronika > Príslušenstvo pre konzoly na videohry: Nabíjacie doky; Príslušenstvo k domácej hernej konzole; Interaktívne herné figúrky; Príslušenstvo pre prenosné herné konzoly; Sim racing kokpity; Káble herných konzol; Herné ovládače; Príslušenstvo headsetu virtuálnej reality
tr: Elektronik > Video Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları: Şarj Üniteleri; Ev Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları; İnteraktif Oyun Figürleri; Taşınabilir Oyun Konsolu Aksesuarları; Sim Yarış Kokpitleri; Video Oyun Konsolu Kabloları; Video Oyunu Oyun Kumandaları; Sanal Gerçeklik Gözlüğü Aksesuarları
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子游戏机配件: 充电底座; 家用游戏机配件; 互动游戏人偶; 掌机配件; 模拟赛车座舱; 游戏机线缆; 游戏手柄; 虚拟现实头显配件
sl-SI: Elektronika > Dodatki za igralne konzole: Polnilci za igralne konzole; Dodatki za domače igralne konzole; Interaktivne igralne figure; Dodatki za prenosne igralne konzole; Kabine za simulacijo dirk; Kabli za igralne konzole; Krmilniki za video igre; Dodatki za VR očala
es: Electrónica > Accesorios para videoconsolas: Muelles de carga; Accesorios para consolas de sobremesa; Figuras de juego interactivas; Accesorios para consolas portátiles; Cabinas de simulación de carreras; Cables de consola de videojuegos; Controles de videojuegos; Accesorios para visores de realidad virtual
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ κονσολών βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Σταθμοί φόρτισης; Αξεσουάρ οικιακών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Διαδραστικές φιγούρες παιχνιδιών; Αξεσουάρ φορητών κονσολών παιχνιδιών; Καμπίνες προσομοίωσης αγώνων ταχύτητας; Καλώδια κονσόλας βιντεοπαιχνιδιών; Χειριστήρια βιντεοπαιχνιδιών; Αξεσουάρ κασκών εικονικής πραγματικότητας
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện bảng điều khiển giao tiếp trò chơi điện tử: Chân đế sạc; Phụ kiện máy chơi game tại nhà; Nhân vật chơi game tương tác; Phụ kiện máy chơi game cầm tay; Ghế sim racing; Cáp máy chơi game; Bộ điều khiển trò chơi video; Phụ kiện tai nghe thực tế ảo
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 게임 콘솔 부대용품: 충전 독; 가정용 게임 콘솔 부대용품; 인터랙티브 게이밍 피규어; 휴대용 게임기 부대용품; 시뮬레이션 레이싱 조종석; 비디오 게임 콘솔 케이블; 비디오 게임 컨트롤러; 가상 현실 헤드셋 액세서리
it: Elettronica > Accessori console videogiochi: Dock di ricarica; Accessori console di gioco; Figure interattive per videogiochi; Accessori console portatili; Cockpit per corse simulate; Cavi per console di videogiochi; Controller per videogiochi; Accessori per visori di realtà virtuale
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo žaidimų konsolių priedai: Įkrovimo stotelės; Namų žaidimų konsolių priedai; Interaktyvios žaidimų figūrėlės; Nešiojamųjų žaidimų konsolių priedai; Simuliacijos lenktynių kabinos; Vaizdo žaidimų konsolių kabeliai; Vaizdo žaidimų valdikliai; Virtualios realybės ausinių aksesuarai
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires pour consoles de jeu vidéo: Stations de charge; Accessoires pour consoles de jeu de salon; Figurines de jeu interactives; Accessoires pour consoles de jeu portables; Cockpits de simulation de course; Câbles pour consoles de jeux vidéo; Contrôleurs de jeu vidéo; Accessoires pour casques de réalité virtuelle
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電動遊戲機配件: 充電座; 家庭電視遊樂器配件; 互動式遊戲人偶; 可攜式遊戲主機配件; 模擬賽車駕駛艙; 電子遊戲機纜線; 電子遊戲控制器; 虛擬實境頭盔配件
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за конзоли за видеоигри: Станции за зареждане; Аксесоари за домашни игрови конзоли; Интерактивни игрални фигури; Аксесоари за преносими игрови конзоли; Пилотски кабини за състезателен симулатор; Кабели за видео игрова конзола; Контролери за видео игра; Аксесоари за слушалки за виртуална реалност
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii pentru console de jocuri video: Suporturi pentru încărcare; Accesorii pentru console de jocuri; Figurine interactive pentru jocuri; Accesorii pentru console de jocuri portabile; Cockpituri pentru simulatoare de curse; Cabluri pentru console de jocuri video; Controlere pentru jocuri video; Accesorii pentru căști de realitate virtuală
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для игровых консолей: Зарядные станции; Аксессуары для стационарных игровых консолей; Интерактивные игровые фигурки; Аксессуары для портативных игровых консолей; Кокпиты для симуляторов гонок; Кабели для игровых консолей; Контроллеры для видеоигр; Аксессуары для гарнитур виртуальной реальности
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอนโซลวิดีโอเกม: แท่นเสียบชาร์จ; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องเกมคอนโซล; ฟิกเกอร์เกมอินเทอร์แอคทีฟ; อุปกรณ์คอนโซลเกมแบบพกพา; ห้องนักบินจำลองเกมแข่งรถ; สายเคเบิลเครื่องเกมคอนโซล; จอยคอนโทรลเลอร์วิดีโอเกม; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับชุดหูฟังเสมือนจริง
ja: 電子機器 > ゲーム機関連用品: 充電ドック; 家庭用テレビゲーム機関連用品; インタラクティブゲームフィギュア; 携帯型ゲーム機関連用品; シムレーシングコックピット; ビデオゲーム機ケーブル; ビデオゲームコントローラー; VRヘッドセットアクセサリー
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para consoles de videogame: Docas de carregamento; Acessórios para consoles caseiros; Figuras de jogo interativas; Acessórios para consoles de jogo portáteis; Cockpits de simulação de corrida; Cabos para console de videogame; Controles de videogame; Acessórios para headsets de realidade virtual
nb: Elektronikk > Tilbehør til spillkonsoller: Ladedokker; Tilbehør til hjemmespillkonsoller; Interaktive spillfigurer; Tilbehør til portable spillkonsoller; Sim racing cockpits; Videospillkonsollkabler; Videospillkontrollere; Tilbehør til VR-headset
hu: Elektronika > Videojátékkonzol-kiegészítők: Töltődokkok; Otthoni játékkonzol-kiegészítők; Interaktív játékfigurák; Hordozható játékkonzol-kiegészítők; Szimulátorverseny-cockpitek; Videojátékkonzol-kábelek; Videojáték-vezérlők; Virtuális valóság headset-kiegészítők